Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1666.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 13, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-1311, to read: START_STATUTE13-1311. In-state custodial interference; civil liability; classification A. A PERSON COMMITS IN-STATE CUSTODIAL INTERFERENCE IF, KNOWING OR HAVING REASON TO KNOW THAT THE PERSON HAS NO LEGAL RIGHT TO DO SO, THE PERSON, WITH THE INTENT TO INTERFERE WITH A LAWFUL CUSTODY ORDER, TAKES, ENTICES OR KEEPS FROM LAWFUL CUSTODY in this state ANY CHILD FROM THE child's PARENT, LEGAL GUARDIAN OR LAWFUL CUSTODIAN. b. A PERSON WHO IS FOUND RESPONSIBLE FOR A FIRST VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION or a second violation of this section committed within ten years after the first violation IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY of $500. C. A third or subsequent violation of this section is a class 6 felony. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Effective date Section 13-1311, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, is effective from and after December 31, 2026.